District of Columbia statutes.
22-1805

Persons advising, inciting, or conniving at criminal offense to be charged as principals.

In prosecutions for any criminal offense all persons advising, inciting, or conniving at the offense, or aiding or abetting the principal offender, shall be charged as principals and not as accessories, the intent of this section being that as to all accessories before the fact the law heretofore applicable in cases of misdemeanor only shall apply to all crimes, whatever the punishment may be.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1337, ch. 854, § 908

History

1981 Ed., § 22-105.
1973 Ed., § 22-105.

Prior Codifications